pt-BR: Acabamento após o cozimento: Glitter; Brilhante; Brilha no escuro; Efeito granito/pedra; Fosco; Metálico; Opaco; Perolado; Acetinado; Salpicado; Translúcido; Outros
zh-TW: 烘烤後表面效果: 亮片; 亮面; 夜光; 花崗岩 / 石紋效果; 霧面; 金屬色; 不透明; 珠光; 緞面; 斑點; 半透明; 其他
vi: Hoàn thiện sau khi nung: Lấp lánh; Bóng; Phát sáng trong đêm; Hiệu ứng đá/granite; Mờ; Ánh kim; Đục; Ánh ngọc trai; Bóng mờ; Lốm đốm; Bán trong suốt; Khác
fr: Finition après cuisson: Paillettes; Brillant; Phosphorescent; Effet granit/pierre; Mat; Métallique; Opaque; Nacré; Satiné; Tacheté; Translucide; Autre
nl: Afwerking na het bakken: Glitter; Glanzend; Glow-in-the-dark; Graniet-/steeneffect; Mat; Metallic; Opaak; Parelmoer; Zijdeglans; Gespikkeld; Doorschijnend; Overige
en: Finish after baking: Glitter; Glossy; Glow-in-the-dark; Granite/stone effect; Matte; Metallic; Opaque; Pearlescent; Satin; Speckled; Translucent; Other
hu: Kiégetés utáni megjelenés: Csillámos; Fényes; Sötétben világító; Gránit/kő hatású; Matt; Fémes; Átlátszatlan; Gyöngyházfényű; Szatén; Pettyes; Áttetsző; Egyéb
sl-SI: Končni premaz ali obdelava po peki: Z bleščicami; Sijajen; Sveti v temi; Učinek granita/kamna; Mat; Kovinski; Neprosojen; Biserni; Satenast; Pikčast; Prosojen; Drugo
pt-PT: Finalize após assar: Glitter; Brilhante; Brilha no escuro; Efeito granito/pedra; Mate; Metálico; Opaco; Perolado; Acetinado; Salpicado; Translúcido; Outro
da: Finish efter bagning: Glimmer; Blank; Selvlysende; Granit-/steneffekt; Mat; Metallisk; Uigennemsigtig; Perlemor; Satin; Spættet; Gennemskinnelig; Andet
tr: Pişirme işleminden sonra bitirin: Simli; Parlak; Karanlıkta parlayan; Granit/taş efekti; Mat; Metalik; Opak; Sedefli; Saten; Benekli; Yarı saydam; Diğer
fi: Polton jälkeinen viimeistely: Kimalle; Kiiltävä; Pimeässä hohtava; Graniitti-/kiviefekti; Matta; Metallinen; Peittävä; Helmiäinen; Satiini; Pilkullinen; Kuultava; Muu
pl: Zakończ po upieczeniu: Z brokatem; Błyszczące; Świecące w ciemności; Efekt granitu/kamienia; Matowe; Metaliczne; Kryjące; Perłowe; Satynowe; Nakrapiane; Półprzezroczyste; Inne
es: Acabado después de hornear: Purpurina; Brillante; Que brilla en la oscuridad; Efecto granito/piedra; Mate; Metálico; Opaco; Nacarado; Satinado; Moteado; Translúcido; Otro
th: เสร็จสิ้นหลังจากอบเสร็จ: กลิตเตอร์; มันวาว; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; เอฟเฟกต์หินแกรนิต/หิน; ด้าน; เมทัลลิก; ทึบแสง; ประกายมุก; ซาติน; ลายจุด; โปร่งแสง; อื่นๆ
cs: Konečná úprava po vypálení: Třpytivý; Lesklý; Svítící ve tmě; Efekt žuly/kamene; Matný; Metalický; Neprůhledný; Perleťový; Saténový; Skvrnitý; Průsvitný; Jiné
sk-SK: Úprava po vypálení: Trblietavé; Lesklé; Svietiace v tme; Žulový/kamenný efekt; Matné; Metalické; Nepriehľadné; Perleťové; Saténové; Fŕkané; Priesvitné; Iné
hr-HR: Završetak nakon pečenja: Šljokice; Sjajno; Svijetli u mraku; Efekt granita/kamena; Mat; Metalik; Neprozirno; Biserno; Saten; Pjegavo; Poluprozirno; Ostalo
ja: 焼き上がった後の仕上げ: グリッター; 光沢; 蓄光; 御影石/ストーン風; マット; メタリック; 不透明; パール; サテン; 斑点; 半透明; その他
el: Φινίρισμα μετά το ψήσιμο: Γκλίτερ; Γυαλιστερό; Που φωσφορίζει στο σκοτάδι; Εφέ γρανίτη/πέτρας; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Αδιαφανές; Περλέ; Σατινέ; Με πιτσιλιές; Ημιδιαφανές; Άλλο
ru: Внешний вид после выпекания: С блестками; Глянцевое; Светящееся в темноте; Эффект гранита/камня; Матовое; Металлик; Непрозрачное; Перламутровое; Сатиновое; В крапинку; Полупрозрачное; Другое
ro-RO: Finalizați după coacere: Sclipici; Lucios; Luminiscent; Efect de granit/piatră; Mat; Metalizat; Opac; Sidefat; Satinat; Pestriț; Translucid; Altele
lt-LT: Apdaila po kepimo: Blizgus (su blizgučiais); Blizgus (lygus); Švytintis tamsoje; Granito / akmens efektas; Matinis; Metalinis; Nepermatomas; Perlamutrinis; Satininis; Taškuotas; Pusiau skaidrus; Kita
zh-CN: 烘烤完成后即可食用: 亮片; 亮面; 夜光; 花岗岩/石头效果; 哑光; 金属质感; 不透明; 珠光; 缎面; 斑点; 半透明; 其他
ko: 구운 후 마감 상태: 글리터; 유광; 야광; 화강암/돌 효과; 무광; 메탈릭; 불투명; 펄; 새틴; 반점무늬; 반투명; 기타
nb: Ferdig etter steking: Glitter; Blank; Selvlysende; Granitt- / steineffekt; Matt; Metallisk; Ugjennomsiktig; Perlemor; Sateng; Spettet; Gjennomskinnelig; Annet
sv: Ytfinish efter bakning: Glitter; Glansig; Självlysande; Granit-/steneffekt; Matt; Metallic; Opak; Pärlemor; Satin; Spräcklig; Translucent; Övrigt
it: Completare dopo la cottura: Glitter; Lucido; Fosforescente; Effetto granito/pietra; Opaco; Metallizzato; Coprente; Perlescente; Satinato; Punteggiato; Traslucido; Altro
bg-BG: Финално покритие/завършек след изпичане: С брокат; Гланцов; Светещ в тъмното; Ефект на гранит/камък; Матов; Металик; Непрозрачен; Перлен; Сатенен; На пръски; Полупрозрачен; Други
de: Oberflächenbeschaffenheit nach dem Backen: Glitzer; Glänzend; Nachleuchtend; Granit-/Steineffekt; Matt; Metallic; Blickdicht; Perlmutt; Satin; Gesprenkelt; Durchscheinend; Sonstige